Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/hu_affix.dat
SFX t Y 318
SFX t   0    eiül         .
SFX t   0    eiéül        .
SFX t   0    eiéért       .
SFX t   0    eiévé        .
SFX t   0    eiével       .
SFX t   0    eiétől       .
SFX t   0    eiét         .
SFX t   0    eiéről       .
SFX t   0    eiért        .
SFX t   0    eiére        .
SFX t   0    eiénél       .
SFX t   0    eiének       .
SFX t   0    eién         .
SFX t   0    eiéiül       .
SFX t   0    eiéiért      .
SFX t   0    eiéivé       .
SFX t   0    eiéivel      .
SFX t   0    eiéitől      .
SFX t   0    eiéit        .
SFX t   0    eiéiről      .
SFX t   0    eiéire       .
SFX t   0    eiéinél      .
SFX t   0    eiéinek      .
SFX t   0    eiéin        .
SFX t   0    eiéiig       .
SFX t   0    eiéihez      .
SFX t   0    eiéig        .
SFX t   0    eiéiből      .
SFX t   0    eiéiben      .
SFX t   0    eiéibe       .
SFX t   0    eiéi         .
SFX t   0    eiéhez       .
SFX t   0    eiéből       .
SFX t   0    eiében       .
SFX t   0    eiébe        .
SFX t   0    eié          .
SFX t   0    eivé         .
SFX t   0    eivel        .
SFX t   0    eitől        .
SFX t   0    eitekül      .
SFX t   0    eitekéül     .
SFX t   0    eitekéért    .
SFX t   0    eitekévé     .
SFX t   0    eitekével    .
SFX t   0    eitekétől    .
SFX t   0    eitekét      .
SFX t   0    eitekéről    .
SFX t   0    eitekért     .
SFX t   0    eitekére     .
SFX t   0    eitekénél    .
SFX t   0    eitekének    .
SFX t   0    eitekén      .
SFX t   0    eitekéiül    .
SFX t   0    eitekéiért   .
SFX t   0    eitekéivé    .
SFX t   0    eitekéivel   .
SFX t   0    eitekéitől   .
SFX t   0    eitekéit     .
SFX t   0    eitekéiről   .
SFX t   0    eitekéire    .
SFX t   0    eitekéinél   .
SFX t   0    eitekéinek   .
SFX t   0    eitekéin     .
SFX t   0    eitekéiig    .
SFX t   0    eitekéihez   .
SFX t   0    eitekéig     .
SFX t   0    eitekéiből   .
SFX t   0    eitekéiben   .
SFX t   0    eitekéibe    .
SFX t   0    eitekéi      .
SFX t   0    eitekéhez    .
SFX t   0    eitekéből    .
SFX t   0    eitekében    .
SFX t   0    eitekébe     .
SFX t   0    eiteké       .
SFX t   0    eitektől     .
SFX t   0    eitekről     .
SFX t   0    eitekre      .
SFX t   0    eiteknél     .
SFX t   0    eiteknek     .
SFX t   0    eitekként    .
SFX t   0    eitekké      .
SFX t   0    eitekkor     .
SFX t   0    eitekkel     .
SFX t   0    eitekig      .
SFX t   0    eitekhez     .
SFX t   0    eiteket      .
SFX t   0    eiteken      .
SFX t   0    eitekből     .
SFX t   0    eitekben     .
SFX t   0    eitekbe      .
SFX t   0    eitek        .
SFX t   0    eit          .
SFX t   0    eiről        .
SFX t   0    eire         .
SFX t   0    einél        .
SFX t   0    einkül       .
SFX t   0    einkéül      .
SFX t   0    einkéért     .
SFX t   0    einkévé      .
SFX t   0    einkével     .
SFX t   0    einkétől     .
SFX t   0    einkét       .
SFX t   0    einkéről     .
SFX t   0    einkért      .
SFX t   0    einkére      .
SFX t   0    einkénél     .
SFX t   0    einkének     .
SFX t   0    einkén       .
SFX t   0    einkéiül     .
SFX t   0    einkéiért    .
SFX t   0    einkéivé     .
SFX t   0    einkéivel    .
SFX t   0    einkéitől    .
SFX t   0    einkéit      .
SFX t   0    einkéiről    .
SFX t   0    einkéire     .
SFX t   0    einkéinél    .
SFX t   0    einkéinek    .
SFX t   0    einkéin      .
SFX t   0    einkéiig     .
SFX t   0    einkéihez    .
SFX t   0    einkéig      .
SFX t   0    einkéiből    .
SFX t   0    einkéiben    .
SFX t   0    einkéibe     .
SFX t   0    einkéi       .
SFX t   0    einkéhez     .
SFX t   0    einkéből     .
SFX t   0    einkében     .
SFX t   0    einkébe      .
SFX t   0    einké        .
SFX t   0    einktől      .
SFX t   0    einkről      .
SFX t   0    einkre       .
SFX t   0    einknél      .
SFX t   0    einknek      .
SFX t   0    einkként     .
SFX t   0    einkké       .
SFX t   0    einkkor      .
SFX t   0    einkkel      .
SFX t   0    einkig       .
SFX t   0    einkhez      .
SFX t   0    einket       .
SFX t   0    einken       .
SFX t   0    einkből      .
SFX t   0    einkben      .
SFX t   0    einkbe       .
SFX t   0    eink         .
SFX t   0    einek        .
SFX t   0    ein          .
SFX t   0    eimül        .
SFX t   0    eiméül       .
SFX t   0    eiméért      .
SFX t   0    eimévé       .
SFX t   0    eimével      .
SFX t   0    eimétől      .
SFX t   0    eimét        .
SFX t   0    eiméről      .
SFX t   0    eimért       .
SFX t   0    eimére       .
SFX t   0    eiménél      .
SFX t   0    eimének      .
SFX t   0    eimén        .
SFX t   0    eiméiül      .
SFX t   0    eiméiért     .
SFX t   0    eiméivé      .
SFX t   0    eiméivel     .
SFX t   0    eiméitől     .
SFX t   0    eiméit       .
SFX t   0    eiméiről     .
SFX t   0    eiméire      .
SFX t   0    eiméinél     .
SFX t   0    eiméinek     .
SFX t   0    eiméin       .
SFX t   0    eiméiig      .
SFX t   0    eiméihez     .
SFX t   0    eiméig       .
SFX t   0    eiméiből     .
SFX t   0    eiméiben     .
SFX t   0    eiméibe      .
SFX t   0    eiméi        .
SFX t   0    eiméhez      .
SFX t   0    eiméből      .
SFX t   0    eimében      .
SFX t   0    eimébe       .
SFX t   0    eimé         .
SFX t   0    eimtől       .
SFX t   0    eimről       .
SFX t   0    eimre        .
SFX t   0    eimnél       .
SFX t   0    eimnek       .
SFX t   0    eimmé        .
SFX t   0    eimmel       .
SFX t   0    eimként      .
SFX t   0    eimkor       .
SFX t   0    eimig        .
SFX t   0    eimhez       .
SFX t   0    eimet        .
SFX t   0    eimen        .
SFX t   0    eimből       .
SFX t   0    eimben       .
SFX t   0    eimbe        .
SFX t   0    eim          .
SFX t   0    eikül        .
SFX t   0    eikéül       .
SFX t   0    eikéért      .
SFX t   0    eikévé       .
SFX t   0    eikével      .
SFX t   0    eikétől      .
SFX t   0    eikét        .
SFX t   0    eikéről      .
SFX t   0    eikért       .
SFX t   0    eikére       .
SFX t   0    eikénél      .
SFX t   0    eiként       .
SFX t   0    eikének      .
SFX t   0    eikén        .
SFX t   0    eikéiül      .
SFX t   0    eikéiért     .
SFX t   0    eikéivé      .
SFX t   0    eikéivel     .
SFX t   0    eikéitől     .
SFX t   0    eikéit       .
SFX t   0    eikéiről     .
SFX t   0    eikéire      .
SFX t   0    eikéinél     .
SFX t   0    eikéinek     .
SFX t   0    eikéin       .
SFX t   0    eikéiig      .
SFX t   0    eikéihez     .
SFX t   0    eikéig       .
SFX t   0    eikéiből     .
SFX t   0    eikéiben     .
SFX t   0    eikéibe      .
SFX t   0    eikéi        .
SFX t   0    eikéhez      .
SFX t   0    eikéből      .
SFX t   0    eikében      .
SFX t   0    eikébe       .
SFX t   0    eiké         .
SFX t   0    eiktől       .
SFX t   0    eikről       .
SFX t   0    eikre        .
SFX t   0    eikor        .
SFX t   0    eiknél       .
SFX t   0    eiknek       .
SFX t   0    eikként      .
SFX t   0    eikké        .
SFX t   0    eikkor       .
SFX t   0    eikkel       .
SFX t   0    eikig        .
SFX t   0    eikhez       .
SFX t   0    eiket        .
SFX t   0    eiken        .
SFX t   0    eikből       .
SFX t   0    eikben       .
SFX t   0    eikbe        .
SFX t   0    eik          .
SFX t   0    eiig         .
SFX t   0    eihez        .
SFX t   0    eidül        .
SFX t   0    eidéül       .
SFX t   0    eidéért      .
SFX t   0    eidévé       .
SFX t   0    eidével      .
SFX t   0    eidétől      .
SFX t   0    eidét        .
SFX t   0    eidéről      .
SFX t   0    eidért       .
SFX t   0    eidére       .
SFX t   0    eidénél      .
SFX t   0    eidének      .
SFX t   0    eidén        .
SFX t   0    eidéiül      .
SFX t   0    eidéiért     .
SFX t   0    eidéivé      .
SFX t   0    eidéivel     .
SFX t   0    eidéitől     .
SFX t   0    eidéit       .
SFX t   0    eidéiről     .
SFX t   0    eidéire      .
SFX t   0    eidéinél     .
SFX t   0    eidéinek     .
SFX t   0    eidéin       .
SFX t   0    eidéiig      .
SFX t   0    eidéihez     .
SFX t   0    eidéig       .
SFX t   0    eidéiből     .
SFX t   0    eidéiben     .
SFX t   0    eidéibe      .
SFX t   0    eidéi        .
SFX t   0    eidéhez      .
SFX t   0    eidéből      .
SFX t   0    eidében      .
SFX t   0    eidébe       .
SFX t   0    eidé         .
SFX t   0    eidtől       .
SFX t   0    eidről       .
SFX t   0    eidre        .
SFX t   0    eidnél       .
SFX t   0    eidnek       .
SFX t   0    eidként      .
SFX t   0    eidkor       .
SFX t   0    eidig        .
SFX t   0    eidhez       .
SFX t   0    eidet        .
SFX t   0    eiden        .
SFX t   0    eiddé        .
SFX t   0    eiddel       .
SFX t   0    eidből       .
SFX t   0    eidben       .
SFX t   0    eidbe        .
SFX t   0    eid          .
SFX t   0    eiből        .
SFX t   0    eiben        .
SFX t   0    eibe         .
SFX t   0    ei           .
